Illinois, session 104th, HB1050.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Use Tax Act is amended by changing Section 53-5 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 105/3-5)7    Sec. 3-5. Exemptions. Use, which, on and after January 1, 82025, includes use by a lessee, of the following tangible 9personal property is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act:10    (1) Personal property purchased from a corporation, 11society, association, foundation, institution, or 12organization, other than a limited liability company, that is 13organized and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise 14for the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 15personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for the 16purpose of resale by the enterprise.17    (2) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit 18Illinois county fair association for use in conducting, 19operating, or promoting the county fair.20    (3) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit arts 21or cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 22by the Department by rule, that it has received an exemption 23under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that   HB1050- 2 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1is organized and operated primarily for the presentation or 2support of arts or cultural programming, activities, or 3services. These organizations include, but are not limited to, 4music and dramatic arts organizations such as symphony 5orchestras and theatrical groups, arts and cultural service 6organizations, local arts councils, visual arts organizations, 7and media arts organizations. On and after July 1, 2001 (the 8effective date of Public Act 92-35), however, an entity 9otherwise eligible for this exemption shall not make tax-free 10purchases unless it has an active identification number issued 11by the Department.12    (4) Except as otherwise provided in this Act, personal 13property purchased by a governmental body, by a corporation, 14society, association, foundation, or institution organized and 15operated exclusively for charitable, religious, or educational 16purposes, or by a not-for-profit corporation, society, 17association, foundation, institution, or organization that has 18no compensated officers or employees and that is organized and 19operated primarily for the recreation of persons 55 years of 20age or older. A limited liability company may qualify for the 21exemption under this paragraph only if the limited liability 22company is organized and operated exclusively for educational 23purposes. On and after July 1, 1987, however, no entity 24otherwise eligible for this exemption shall make tax-free 25purchases unless it has an active exemption identification 26number issued by the Department.  HB1050- 3 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    (5) Until July 1, 2003, a passenger car that is a 2replacement vehicle to the extent that the purchase price of 3the car is subject to the Replacement Vehicle Tax.4    (6) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again on September 1, 52004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery and 6equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both new 7and used, and including that manufactured on special order, 8certified by the purchaser to be used primarily for graphic 9arts production, and including machinery and equipment 10purchased for lease. Equipment includes chemicals or chemicals 11acting as catalysts but only if the chemicals or chemicals 12acting as catalysts effect a direct and immediate change upon 13a graphic arts product. Beginning on July 1, 2017, graphic 14arts machinery and equipment is included in the manufacturing 15and assembling machinery and equipment exemption under 16paragraph (18). 17    (7) Farm chemicals.18    (8) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or silver 19coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the government of the 20United States of America, or the government of any foreign 21country, and bullion.22    (9) Personal property purchased from a teacher-sponsored 23student organization affiliated with an elementary or 24secondary school located in Illinois.25    (10) A motor vehicle that is used for automobile renting, 26as defined in the Automobile Renting Occupation and Use Tax   HB1050- 4 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1Act.2    (11) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 3including that manufactured on special order, certified by the 4purchaser to be used primarily for production agriculture or 5State or federal agricultural programs, including individual 6replacement parts for the machinery and equipment, including 7machinery and equipment purchased for lease, and including 8implements of husbandry defined in Section 1-130 of the 9Illinois Vehicle Code, farm machinery and agricultural 10chemical and fertilizer spreaders, and nurse wagons required 11to be registered under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle 12Code, but excluding other motor vehicles required to be 13registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural 14polyhouses or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 15overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery and 16equipment under this item (11). Agricultural chemical tender 17tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold separately from a 18motor vehicle required to be licensed and units sold mounted 19on a motor vehicle required to be licensed if the selling price 20of the tender is separately stated.21    Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 22farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 23installed on farm machinery and equipment, including, but not 24limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, seeders, 25or spreaders. Precision farming equipment includes, but is not 26limited to, soil testing sensors, computers, monitors,   HB1050- 5 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1software, global positioning and mapping systems, and other 2such equipment.3    Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 4sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in the 5computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 6facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not limited 7to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of animal and 8crop data for the purpose of formulating animal diets and 9agricultural chemicals. 10    Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and equipment 11also includes electrical power generation equipment used 12primarily for production agriculture. 13    This item (11) is exempt from the provisions of Section 143-90.15    (12) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 16to or used by an air common carrier, certified by the carrier 17to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 18conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a flight 19destined for or returning from a location or locations outside 20the United States without regard to previous or subsequent 21domestic stopovers.22    Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 23to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier to be 24used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the conduct of 25its business as an air common carrier, for a flight that (i) is 26engaged in foreign trade or is engaged in trade between the   HB1050- 6 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1United States and any of its possessions and (ii) transports 2at least one individual or package for hire from the city of 3origination to the city of final destination on the same 4aircraft, without regard to a change in the flight number of 5that aircraft. 6    (13) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 7stated on customers' bills for the purchase and consumption of 8food and beverages purchased at retail from a retailer, to the 9extent that the proceeds of the service charge are in fact 10turned over as tips or as a substitute for tips to the 11employees who participate directly in preparing, serving, 12hosting or cleaning up the food or beverage function with 13respect to which the service charge is imposed.14    (14) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, drilling, 15and production equipment, including (i) rigs and parts of 16rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover rigs, (ii) 17pipe and tubular goods, including casing and drill strings, 18(iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) storage tanks and flow 19lines, (v) any individual replacement part for oil field 20exploration, drilling, and production equipment, and (vi) 21machinery and equipment purchased for lease; but excluding 22motor vehicles required to be registered under the Illinois 23Vehicle Code.24    (15) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, including 25repair and replacement parts, both new and used, including 26that manufactured on special order, certified by the purchaser   HB1050- 7 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1to be used primarily for photoprocessing, and including 2photoprocessing machinery and equipment purchased for lease.3    (16) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate exploration, 4mining, off-highway hauling, processing, maintenance, and 5reclamation equipment, including replacement parts and 6equipment, and including equipment purchased for lease, but 7excluding motor vehicles required to be registered under the 8Illinois Vehicle Code. The changes made to this Section by 9Public Act 97-767 apply on and after July 1, 2003, but no claim 10for credit or refund is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 11(the effective date of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid 12during the period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 1316, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456). 14    (17) Until July 1, 2003, distillation machinery and 15equipment, sold as a unit or kit, assembled or installed by the 16retailer, certified by the user to be used only for the 17production of ethyl alcohol that will be used for consumption 18as motor fuel or as a component of motor fuel for the personal 19use of the user, and not subject to sale or resale.20    (18) Manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 21used primarily in the process of manufacturing or assembling 22tangible personal property for wholesale or retail sale or 23lease, whether that sale or lease is made directly by the 24manufacturer or by some other person, whether the materials 25used in the process are owned by the manufacturer or some other 26person, or whether that sale or lease is made apart from or as   HB1050- 8 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1an incident to the seller's engaging in the service occupation 2of producing machines, tools, dies, jigs, patterns, gauges, or 3other similar items of no commercial value on special order 4for a particular purchaser. The exemption provided by this 5paragraph (18) includes production related tangible personal 6property, as defined in Section 3-50, purchased on or after 7July 1, 2019. The exemption provided by this paragraph (18) 8does not include machinery and equipment used in (i) the 9generation of electricity for wholesale or retail sale; (ii) 10the generation or treatment of natural or artificial gas for 11wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to customers 12through pipes, pipelines, or mains; or (iii) the treatment of 13water for wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to 14customers through pipes, pipelines, or mains. The provisions 15of Public Act 98-583 are declaratory of existing law as to the 16meaning and scope of this exemption. Beginning on July 1, 172017, the exemption provided by this paragraph (18) includes, 18but is not limited to, graphic arts machinery and equipment, 19as defined in paragraph (6) of this Section. 20    (19) Personal property delivered to a purchaser or 21purchaser's donee inside Illinois when the purchase order for 22that personal property was received by a florist located 23outside Illinois who has a florist located inside Illinois 24deliver the personal property.25    (20) Semen used for artificial insemination of livestock 26for direct agricultural production.  HB1050- 9 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    (21) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with and 2meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse Club 3Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American Quarter 4Horse Association, United States Trotting Association, or 5Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for purposes of breeding or 6racing for prizes. This item (21) is exempt from the 7provisions of Section 3-90, and the exemption provided for 8under this item (21) applies for all periods beginning May 30, 91995, but no claim for credit or refund is allowed on or after 10January 1, 2008 for such taxes paid during the period 11beginning May 30, 2000 and ending on January 1, 2008. 12    (22) Computers and communications equipment utilized for 13any hospital purpose and equipment used in the diagnosis, 14analysis, or treatment of hospital patients purchased by a 15lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or 16longer executed or in effect at the time the lessor would 17otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a 18hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 19identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 20the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 21in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 22in any other non-exempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 23the tax imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as 24the case may be, based on the fair market value of the property 25at the time the non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall 26collect or attempt to collect an amount (however designated)   HB1050- 10 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1that purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by 2this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the 3tax has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 4collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 5have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the 6lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 7for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 8Department.9    (23) Personal property purchased by a lessor who leases 10the property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 11in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be subject to 12the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body that has 13been issued an active sales tax exemption identification 14number by the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' 15Occupation Tax Act. If the property is leased in a manner that 16does not qualify for this exemption or used in any other 17non-exempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for the tax 18imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case 19may be, based on the fair market value of the property at the 20time the non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or 21attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 22purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 23Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax 24has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 25collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 26have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the   HB1050- 11 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 2for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 3Department.4    (24) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 5December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 6before December 31, 2004, personal property that is donated 7for disaster relief to be used in a State or federally declared 8disaster area in Illinois or bordering Illinois by a 9manufacturer or retailer that is registered in this State to a 10corporation, society, association, foundation, or institution 11that has been issued a sales tax exemption identification 12number by the Department that assists victims of the disaster 13who reside within the declared disaster area.14    (25) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 15December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 16before December 31, 2004, personal property that is used in 17the performance of infrastructure repairs in this State, 18including, but not limited to, municipal roads and streets, 19access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal systems, 20water and sewer line extensions, water distribution and 21purification facilities, storm water drainage and retention 22facilities, and sewage treatment facilities, resulting from a 23State or federally declared disaster in Illinois or bordering 24Illinois when such repairs are initiated on facilities located 25in the declared disaster area within 6 months after the 26disaster.  HB1050- 12 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    (26) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds purchased 2at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that term is 3used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is exempt from the 4provisions of Section 3-90.5    (27) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 61-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is donated to a 7corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 8foundation, or institution that is determined by the 9Department to be organized and operated exclusively for 10educational purposes. For purposes of this exemption, "a 11corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 12foundation, or institution organized and operated exclusively 13for educational purposes" means all tax-supported public 14schools, private schools that offer systematic instruction in 15useful branches of learning by methods common to public 16schools and that compare favorably in their scope and 17intensity with the course of study presented in tax-supported 18schools, and vocational or technical schools or institutes 19organized and operated exclusively to provide a course of 20study of not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 21individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 22technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 23occupation.24    (28) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 25including food, purchased through fundraising events for the 26benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary school,   HB1050- 13 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1a group of those schools, or one or more school districts if 2the events are sponsored by an entity recognized by the school 3district that consists primarily of volunteers and includes 4parents and teachers of the school children. This paragraph 5does not apply to fundraising events (i) for the benefit of 6private home instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising 7entity purchases the personal property sold at the events from 8another individual or entity that sold the property for the 9purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that profits 10from the sale to the fundraising entity. This paragraph is 11exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.12    (29) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 31, 132001, new or used automatic vending machines that prepare and 14serve hot food and beverages, including coffee, soup, and 15other items, and replacement parts for these machines. 16Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2003, machines 17and parts for machines used in commercial, coin-operated 18amusement and vending business if a use or occupation tax is 19paid on the gross receipts derived from the use of the 20commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending machines. This 21paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.22    (30) Beginning January 1, 2001 and through June 30, 2016, 23food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 24premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 25soft drinks, and food that has been prepared for immediate 26consumption) and prescription and nonprescription medicines,   HB1050- 14 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1drugs, medical appliances, and insulin, urine testing 2materials, syringes, and needles used by diabetics, for human 3use, when purchased for use by a person receiving medical 4assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code who 5resides in a licensed long-term care facility, as defined in 6the Nursing Home Care Act, or in a licensed facility as defined 7in the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the 8Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.9    (31) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 10Public Act 92-227), computers and communications equipment 11utilized for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 12diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients 13purchased by a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease 14of one year or longer executed or in effect at the time the 15lessor would otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this 16Act, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 17identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 18the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 19in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 20in any other nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 21the tax imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as 22the case may be, based on the fair market value of the property 23at the time the nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall 24collect or attempt to collect an amount (however designated) 25that purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by 26this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the   HB1050- 15 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1tax has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 2collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 3have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the 4lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 5for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 6Department. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 7Section 3-90.8    (32) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 9Public Act 92-227), personal property purchased by a lessor 10who leases the property, under a lease of one year or longer 11executed or in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be 12subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body 13that has been issued an active sales tax exemption 14identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 15the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the property is leased 16in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or used in 17any other nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for the 18tax imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the 19case may be, based on the fair market value of the property at 20the time the nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect 21or attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 22purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 23Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax 24has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 25collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 26have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the   HB1050- 16 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 2for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 3Department. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 4Section 3-90.5    (33) On and after July 1, 2003 and through June 30, 2004, 6the use in this State of motor vehicles of the second division 7with a gross vehicle weight in excess of 8,000 pounds and that 8are subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed under 9Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. Beginning on 10July 1, 2004 and through June 30, 2005, the use in this State 11of motor vehicles of the second division: (i) with a gross 12vehicle weight rating in excess of 8,000 pounds; (ii) that are 13subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed under 14Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; and (iii) that 15are primarily used for commercial purposes. Through June 30, 162005, this exemption applies to repair and replacement parts 17added after the initial purchase of such a motor vehicle if 18that motor vehicle is used in a manner that would qualify for 19the rolling stock exemption otherwise provided for in this 20Act. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "used for 21commercial purposes" means the transportation of persons or 22property in furtherance of any commercial or industrial 23enterprise, whether for-hire or not. 24    (34) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal property 25used in the construction or maintenance of a community water 26supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of the Environmental   HB1050- 17 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1Protection Act, that is operated by a not-for-profit 2corporation that holds a valid water supply permit issued 3under Title IV of the Environmental Protection Act. This 4paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.5    (35) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 6December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, components, 7and furnishings incorporated into or upon an aircraft as part 8of the modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, 9repair, or maintenance of the aircraft. This exemption 10includes consumable supplies used in the modification, 11refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, and 12maintenance of aircraft. However, until January 1, 2024, this 13exemption excludes any materials, parts, equipment, 14components, and consumable supplies used in the modification, 15replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 16power plants, whether such engines or power plants are 17installed or uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable 18supplies" include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 19sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 20latex gloves, and protective films. 21    Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through December 2231, 2023, this exemption applies only to the use of qualifying 23tangible personal property by persons who modify, refurbish, 24complete, repair, replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) 25hold an Air Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 26approved repair station by the Federal Aviation   HB1050- 18 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct 2operations in accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation 3Regulations. From January 1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, 4this exemption applies only to the use of qualifying tangible 5personal property by: (A) persons who modify, refurbish, 6complete, repair, replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) 7hold an Air Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 8approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 9Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct 10operations in accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation 11Regulations; and (B) persons who engage in the modification, 12replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 13power plants without regard to whether or not those persons 14meet the qualifications of item (A). 15    The exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 16commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 17service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or Part 18129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The changes made to 19this paragraph (35) by Public Act 98-534 are declarative of 20existing law. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the 21exemption under this paragraph (35) applies continuously from 22January 1, 2010 through December 31, 2024; however, no claim 23for credit or refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of 24the disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015 25and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of Public Act 26101-629).  HB1050- 19 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    (36) Tangible personal property purchased by a 2public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 311-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 4constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, but 5only if the legal title to the municipal convention hall is 6transferred to the municipality without any further 7consideration by or on behalf of the municipality at the time 8of the completion of the municipal convention hall or upon the 9retirement or redemption of any bonds or other debt 10instruments issued by the public-facilities corporation in 11connection with the development of the municipal convention 12hall. This exemption includes existing public-facilities 13corporations as provided in Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois 14Municipal Code. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 15of Section 3-90. 16    (37) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 31, 172026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 18    (38) Merchandise that is subject to the Rental Purchase 19Agreement Occupation and Use Tax. The purchaser must certify 20that the item is purchased to be rented subject to a 21rental-purchase agreement, as defined in the Rental-Purchase 22Agreement Act, and provide proof of registration under the 23Rental Purchase Agreement Occupation and Use Tax Act. This 24paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.25    (39) Tangible personal property purchased by a purchaser 26who is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act by operation of   HB1050- 20 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 2Section 3-90.3    (40) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 4construction or operation of a data center that has been 5granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 6Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 7personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 8tenant of the data center or by a contractor or subcontractor 9of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data centers that would 10have qualified for a certificate of exemption prior to January 111, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 been in effect may apply for and 12obtain an exemption for subsequent purchases of computer 13equipment or enabling software purchased or leased to upgrade, 14supplement, or replace computer equipment or enabling software 15purchased or leased in the original investment that would have 16qualified. 17    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall 18grant a certificate of exemption under this item (40) to 19qualified data centers as defined by Section 605-1025 of the 20Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the 21Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 22    For the purposes of this item (40): 23        "Data center" means a building or a series of 24    buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house working 25    servers in one physical location or multiple sites within 26    the State of Illinois.   HB1050- 21 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 2    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 3    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 4    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 5    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 6    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets; 7    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 8    systems; peripheral components or systems; software; 9    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery 10    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 11    systems; other cabling; and other data center 12    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate 13    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures; 14    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 15    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and 16    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to 17    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage 18    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible 19    personal property; and all other tangible personal 20    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 21    data center. The term "qualified tangible personal 22    property" also includes building materials physically 23    incorporated into the qualifying data center. To document 24    the exemption allowed under this Section, the retailer 25    must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the certificate 26    of eligibility issued by the Department of Commerce and   HB1050- 22 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    Economic Opportunity. 2    This item (40) is exempt from the provisions of Section 33-90. 4    (41) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 5collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. This 6item (41) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90. As 7used in this item (41): 8        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 9    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 10    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 11    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 12    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 13    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 14    time of sale. 15        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 16    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 17    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 18    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 19    milk until it is ready for consumption. 20        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 21    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 22    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 23    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 24    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 25    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 26    milk storage bags.   HB1050- 23 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 2    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 3    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 4    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 5    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 6    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 7    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 8    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 9    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 10    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 11    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 12    or distributor. 13        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 14    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 15    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 16    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 17    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 18    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 19    manufacturer or distributor. 20    (42) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf of 21the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 22Property Act. This item (42) is exempt from the provisions of 23Section 3-90. 24    (43) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 25property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 26forces of the United States who presents valid military   HB1050- 24 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1identification and purchases the property using a form of 2payment where the federal government is the payor. The member 3of the armed forces must complete, at the point of sale, a form 4prescribed by the Department of Revenue documenting that the 5transaction is eligible for the exemption under this 6paragraph. Retailers must keep the form as documentation of 7the exemption in their records for a period of not less than 6 8years. "Armed forces of the United States" means the United 9States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or 10Coast Guard. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 11Section 3-90. 12    (44) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals provided 13to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment is made by an 14intermediary, such as a Medicare Administrative Contractor, a 15Managed Care Organization, or a Medicare Advantage 16Organization, pursuant to a government contract. This item 17(44) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90. 18    (45) (44) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 19in Section 3-10, food for human consumption that is to be 20consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 21alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 22use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 23prepared for immediate consumption). This item (45) (44) is 24exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90. 25    (46) (44) Use by the lessee of the following leased 26tangible personal property:  HB1050- 25 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1        (1) software transferred subject to a license that 2    meets the following requirements:3            (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement signed 4        by the licensor and the customer;5                (i) an electronic agreement in which the 6            customer accepts the license by means of an 7            electronic signature that is verifiable and can be 8            authenticated and is attached to or made part of 9            the license will comply with this requirement;10                (ii) a license agreement in which the customer 11            electronically accepts the terms by clicking "I 12            agree" does not comply with this requirement;13            (B) it restricts the customer's duplication and 14        use of the software;15            (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 16        sublicensing, or transferring the software to a third 17        party (except to a related party) without the 18        permission and continued control of the licensor;19            (D) the licensor has a policy of providing another 20        copy at minimal or no charge if the customer loses or 21        damages the software, or of permitting the licensee to 22        make and keep an archival copy, and such policy is 23        either stated in the license agreement, supported by 24        the licensor's books and records, or supported by a 25        notarized statement made under penalties of perjury by 26        the licensor; and  HB1050- 26 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1            (E) the customer must destroy or return all copies 2        of the software to the licensor at the end of the 3        license period; this provision is deemed to be met, in 4        the case of a perpetual license, without being set 5        forth in the license agreement; and6        (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 7    receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local government 8    if the ordinance imposing that tax was adopted prior to 9    January 1, 2023. 10    (47) On and after January 1, 2026, hearing aids. As used in 11this item (47), "hearing aid" means any wearable 12non-disposable, non-experimental instrument or device designed 13to aid or compensate for impaired human hearing and any parts, 14attachments, or accessories for the instrument or device, 15including an ear mold but excluding batteries and cords. This 16item (47) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90. 17(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-700, Article 70, 18Section 70-5, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, Article 75, Section 75-5, 19eff. 4-19-22; 102-1026, eff. 5-27-22; 103-9, Article 5, 20Section 5-5, eff. 6-7-23; 103-9, Article 15, Section 15-5, 21eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 22103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 237-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; revised 2411-26-24.) 25    Section 10. The Service Use Tax Act is amended by changing   HB1050- 27 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1Section 3-5 as follows: 2    (35 ILCS 110/3-5)3    Sec. 3-5. Exemptions. Use of the following tangible 4personal property is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act:5    (1) Personal property purchased from a corporation, 6society, association, foundation, institution, or 7organization, other than a limited liability company, that is 8organized and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise 9for the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 10personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for the 11purpose of resale by the enterprise.12    (2) Personal property purchased by a non-profit Illinois 13county fair association for use in conducting, operating, or 14promoting the county fair.15    (3) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit arts 16or cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 17by the Department by rule, that it has received an exemption 18under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that 19is organized and operated primarily for the presentation or 20support of arts or cultural programming, activities, or 21services. These organizations include, but are not limited to, 22music and dramatic arts organizations such as symphony 23orchestras and theatrical groups, arts and cultural service 24organizations, local arts councils, visual arts organizations, 25and media arts organizations. On and after July 1, 2001 (the   HB1050- 28 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1effective date of Public Act 92-35), however, an entity 2otherwise eligible for this exemption shall not make tax-free 3purchases unless it has an active identification number issued 4by the Department.5    (4) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or silver 6coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the government of the 7United States of America, or the government of any foreign 8country, and bullion.9    (5) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again on September 1, 102004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery and 11equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both new 12and used, and including that manufactured on special order or 13purchased for lease, certified by the purchaser to be used 14primarily for graphic arts production. Equipment includes 15chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts but only if the 16chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts effect a direct and 17immediate change upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on 18July 1, 2017, graphic arts machinery and equipment is included 19in the manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 20exemption under Section 2 of this Act.21    (6) Personal property purchased from a teacher-sponsored 22student organization affiliated with an elementary or 23secondary school located in Illinois.24    (7) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 25including that manufactured on special order, certified by the 26purchaser to be used primarily for production agriculture or   HB1050- 29 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1State or federal agricultural programs, including individual 2replacement parts for the machinery and equipment, including 3machinery and equipment purchased for lease, and including 4implements of husbandry defined in Section 1-130 of the 5Illinois Vehicle Code, farm machinery and agricultural 6chemical and fertilizer spreaders, and nurse wagons required 7to be registered under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle 8Code, but excluding other motor vehicles required to be 9registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural 10polyhouses or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 11overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery and 12equipment under this item (7). Agricultural chemical tender 13tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold separately from a 14motor vehicle required to be licensed and units sold mounted 15on a motor vehicle required to be licensed if the selling price 16of the tender is separately stated.17    Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 18farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 19installed on farm machinery and equipment, including, but not 20limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, seeders, 21or spreaders. Precision farming equipment includes, but is not 22limited to, soil testing sensors, computers, monitors, 23software, global positioning and mapping systems, and other 24such equipment.25    Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 26sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in the   HB1050- 30 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 2facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not limited 3to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of animal and 4crop data for the purpose of formulating animal diets and 5agricultural chemicals. 6    Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and equipment 7also includes electrical power generation equipment used 8primarily for production agriculture. 9    This item (7) is exempt from the provisions of Section 103-75.11    (8) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 12to or used by an air common carrier, certified by the carrier 13to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 14conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a flight 15destined for or returning from a location or locations outside 16the United States without regard to previous or subsequent 17domestic stopovers.18    Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 19to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier to be 20used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the conduct of 21its business as an air common carrier, for a flight that (i) is 22engaged in foreign trade or is engaged in trade between the 23United States and any of its possessions and (ii) transports 24at least one individual or package for hire from the city of 25origination to the city of final destination on the same 26aircraft, without regard to a change in the flight number of   HB1050- 31 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1that aircraft. 2    (9) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 3stated on customers' bills for the purchase and consumption of 4food and beverages acquired as an incident to the purchase of a 5service from a serviceman, to the extent that the proceeds of 6the service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a 7substitute for tips to the employees who participate directly 8in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the food or 9beverage function with respect to which the service charge is 10imposed.11    (10) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, drilling, 12and production equipment, including (i) rigs and parts of 13rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover rigs, (ii) 14pipe and tubular goods, including casing and drill strings, 15(iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) storage tanks and flow 16lines, (v) any individual replacement part for oil field 17exploration, drilling, and production equipment, and (vi) 18machinery and equipment purchased for lease; but excluding 19motor vehicles required to be registered under the Illinois 20Vehicle Code.21    (11) Proceeds from the sale of photoprocessing machinery 22and equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both 23new and used, including that manufactured on special order, 24certified by the purchaser to be used primarily for 25photoprocessing, and including photoprocessing machinery and 26equipment purchased for lease.  HB1050- 32 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    (12) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate exploration, 2mining, off-highway hauling, processing, maintenance, and 3reclamation equipment, including replacement parts and 4equipment, and including equipment purchased for lease, but 5excluding motor vehicles required to be registered under the 6Illinois Vehicle Code. The changes made to this Section by 7Public Act 97-767 apply on and after July 1, 2003, but no claim 8for credit or refund is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 9(the effective date of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid 10during the period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 1116, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).12    (13) Semen used for artificial insemination of livestock 13for direct agricultural production.14    (14) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with and 15meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse Club 16Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American Quarter 17Horse Association, United States Trotting Association, or 18Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for purposes of breeding or 19racing for prizes. This item (14) is exempt from the 20provisions of Section 3-75, and the exemption provided for 21under this item (14) applies for all periods beginning May 30, 221995, but no claim for credit or refund is allowed on or after 23January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for 24such taxes paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and 25ending on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 2695-88).  HB1050- 33 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    (15) Computers and communications equipment utilized for 2any hospital purpose and equipment used in the diagnosis, 3analysis, or treatment of hospital patients purchased by a 4lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or 5longer executed or in effect at the time the lessor would 6otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a 7hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 8identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 9the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 10in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 11in any other non-exempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 12the tax imposed under this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case 13may be, based on the fair market value of the property at the 14time the non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or 15attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 16purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 17Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not 18been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any 19such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal 20right to claim a refund of that amount from the lessor. If, 21however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee for any 22reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 23Department.24    (16) Personal property purchased by a lessor who leases 25the property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 26in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be subject to   HB1050- 34 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body that has 2been issued an active tax exemption identification number by 3the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' Occupation 4Tax Act. If the property is leased in a manner that does not 5qualify for this exemption or is used in any other non-exempt 6manner, the lessor shall be liable for the tax imposed under 7this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, based on the 8fair market value of the property at the time the 9non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or attempt 10to collect an amount (however designated) that purports to 11reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this Act or the 12Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not been paid 13by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any such amount 14from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal right to claim a 15refund of that amount from the lessor. If, however, that 16amount is not refunded to the lessee for any reason, the lessor 17is liable to pay that amount to the Department.18    (17) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 19December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 20before December 31, 2004, personal property that is donated 21for disaster relief to be used in a State or federally declared 22disaster area in Illinois or bordering Illinois by a 23manufacturer or retailer that is registered in this State to a 24corporation, society, association, foundation, or institution 25that has been issued a sales tax exemption identification 26number by the Department that assists victims of the disaster   HB1050- 35 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1who reside within the declared disaster area.2    (18) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 3December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 4before December 31, 2004, personal property that is used in 5the performance of infrastructure repairs in this State, 6including, but not limited to, municipal roads and streets, 7access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal systems, 8water and sewer line extensions, water distribution and 9purification facilities, storm water drainage and retention 10facilities, and sewage treatment facilities, resulting from a 11State or federally declared disaster in Illinois or bordering 12Illinois when such repairs are initiated on facilities located 13in the declared disaster area within 6 months after the 14disaster.15    (19) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds purchased 16at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that term is 17used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is exempt from the 18provisions of Section 3-75.19    (20) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 201-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is donated to a 21corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 22foundation, or institution that is determined by the 23Department to be organized and operated exclusively for 24educational purposes. For purposes of this exemption, "a 25corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 26foundation, or institution organized and operated exclusively   HB1050- 36 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1for educational purposes" means all tax-supported public 2schools, private schools that offer systematic instruction in 3useful branches of learning by methods common to public 4schools and that compare favorably in their scope and 5intensity with the course of study presented in tax-supported 6schools, and vocational or technical schools or institutes 7organized and operated exclusively to provide a course of 8study of not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 9individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 10technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 11occupation.12    (21) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 13including food, purchased through fundraising events for the 14benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary school, 15a group of those schools, or one or more school districts if 16the events are sponsored by an entity recognized by the school 17district that consists primarily of volunteers and includes 18parents and teachers of the school children. This paragraph 19does not apply to fundraising events (i) for the benefit of 20private home instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising 21entity purchases the personal property sold at the events from 22another individual or entity that sold the property for the 23purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that profits 24from the sale to the fundraising entity. This paragraph is 25exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.26    (22) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 31,   HB1050- 37 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b12001, new or used automatic vending machines that prepare and 2serve hot food and beverages, including coffee, soup, and 3other items, and replacement parts for these machines. 4Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2003, machines 5and parts for machines used in commercial, coin-operated 6amusement and vending business if a use or occupation tax is 7paid on the gross receipts derived from the use of the 8commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending machines. This 9paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.10    (23) Beginning August 23, 2001 and through June 30, 2016, 11food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 12premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 13soft drinks, and food that has been prepared for immediate 14consumption) and prescription and nonprescription medicines, 15drugs, medical appliances, and insulin, urine testing 16materials, syringes, and needles used by diabetics, for human 17use, when purchased for use by a person receiving medical 18assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code who 19resides in a licensed long-term care facility, as defined in 20the Nursing Home Care Act, or in a licensed facility as defined 21in the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the 22Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.23    (24) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 24Public Act 92-227), computers and communications equipment 25utilized for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 26diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients   HB1050- 38 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1purchased by a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease 2of one year or longer executed or in effect at the time the 3lessor would otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this 4Act, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 5identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 6the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 7in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 8in any other nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 9the tax imposed under this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case 10may be, based on the fair market value of the property at the 11time the nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or 12attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 13purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 14Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not 15been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any 16such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal 17right to claim a refund of that amount from the lessor. If, 18however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee for any 19reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 20Department. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 21Section 3-75.22    (25) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 23Public Act 92-227), personal property purchased by a lessor 24who leases the property, under a lease of one year or longer 25executed or in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be 26subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body   HB1050- 39 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1that has been issued an active tax exemption identification 2number by the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' 3Occupation Tax Act. If the property is leased in a manner that 4does not qualify for this exemption or is used in any other 5nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for the tax 6imposed under this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, 7based on the fair market value of the property at the time the 8nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or attempt 9to collect an amount (however designated) that purports to 10reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this Act or the 11Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not been paid 12by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any such amount 13from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal right to claim a 14refund of that amount from the lessor. If, however, that 15amount is not refunded to the lessee for any reason, the lessor 16is liable to pay that amount to the Department. This paragraph 17is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.18    (26) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal property 19used in the construction or maintenance of a community water 20supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of the Environmental 21Protection Act, that is operated by a not-for-profit 22corporation that holds a valid water supply permit issued 23under Title IV of the Environmental Protection Act. This 24paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. 25    (27) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 26December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, components,   HB1050- 40 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1and furnishings incorporated into or upon an aircraft as part 2of the modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, 3repair, or maintenance of the aircraft. This exemption 4includes consumable supplies used in the modification, 5refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, and 6maintenance of aircraft. However, until January 1, 2024, this 7exemption excludes any materials, parts, equipment, 8components, and consumable supplies used in the modification, 9replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 10power plants, whether such engines or power plants are 11installed or uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable 12supplies" include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 13sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 14latex gloves, and protective films. 15    Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through December 1631, 2023, this exemption applies only to the use of qualifying 17tangible personal property transferred incident to the 18modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, 19or maintenance of aircraft by persons who (i) hold an Air 20Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an approved 21repair station by the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) 22have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in 23accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. 24From January 1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, this exemption 25applies only to the use of qualifying tangible personal 26property transferred incident to: (A) the modification,   HB1050- 41 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1refurbishment, completion, repair, replacement, or maintenance 2of an aircraft by persons who (i) hold an Air Agency 3Certificate and are empowered to operate an approved repair 4station by the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) have a 5Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in accordance 6with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations; and (B) the 7modification, replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft 8engines or power plants without regard to whether or not those 9persons meet the qualifications of item (A).10    The exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 11commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 12service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or Part 13129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The changes made to 14this paragraph (27) by Public Act 98-534 are declarative of 15existing law. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the 16exemption under this paragraph (27) applies continuously from 17January 1, 2010 through December 31, 2024; however, no claim 18for credit or refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of 19the disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015 20and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of Public Act 21101-629).22    (28) Tangible personal property purchased by a 23public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 2411-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 25constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, but 26only if the legal title to the municipal convention hall is   HB1050- 42 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1transferred to the municipality without any further 2consideration by or on behalf of the municipality at the time 3of the completion of the municipal convention hall or upon the 4retirement or redemption of any bonds or other debt 5instruments issued by the public-facilities corporation in 6connection with the development of the municipal convention 7hall. This exemption includes existing public-facilities 8corporations as provided in Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois 9Municipal Code. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 10of Section 3-75. 11    (29) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 31, 122026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 13    (30) Tangible personal property transferred to a purchaser 14who is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act by operation of 15federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 16Section 3-75. 17    (31) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 18construction or operation of a data center that has been 19granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 20Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 21personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 22tenant of the data center or by a contractor or subcontractor 23of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data centers that would 24have qualified for a certificate of exemption prior to January 251, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 been in effect, may apply for and 26obtain an exemption for subsequent purchases of computer   HB1050- 43 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1equipment or enabling software purchased or leased to upgrade, 2supplement, or replace computer equipment or enabling software 3purchased or leased in the original investment that would have 4qualified. 5    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall 6grant a certificate of exemption under this item (31) to 7qualified data centers as defined by Section 605-1025 of the 8Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the 9Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 10    For the purposes of this item (31): 11        "Data center" means a building or a series of 12    buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house working 13    servers in one physical location or multiple sites within 14    the State of Illinois. 15        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 16    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 17    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 18    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 19    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 20    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets; 21    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 22    systems; peripheral components or systems; software; 23    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery 24    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 25    systems; other cabling; and other data center 26    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate   HB1050- 44 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures; 2    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 3    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and 4    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to 5    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage 6    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible 7    personal property; and all other tangible personal 8    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 9    data center. The term "qualified tangible personal 10    property" also includes building materials physically 11    incorporated into the qualifying data center. To document 12    the exemption allowed under this Section, the retailer 13    must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the certificate 14    of eligibility issued by the Department of Commerce and 15    Economic Opportunity. 16    This item (31) is exempt from the provisions of Section 173-75. 18    (32) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 19collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. This 20item (32) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. As 21used in this item (32): 22        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 23    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 24    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 25    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 26    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump   HB1050- 45 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 2    time of sale. 3        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 4    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 5    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 6    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 7    milk until it is ready for consumption. 8        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 9    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 10    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 11    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 12    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 13    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 14    milk storage bags. 15        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 16    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 17    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 18    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 19    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 20    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 21    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 22    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 23    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 24    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 25    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 26    or distributor.   HB1050- 46 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 2    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 3    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 4    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 5    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 6    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 7    manufacturer or distributor. 8    (33) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf of 9the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 10Property Act. This item (33) is exempt from the provisions of 11Section 3-75. 12    (34) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 13property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 14forces of the United States who presents valid military 15identification and purchases the property using a form of 16payment where the federal government is the payor. The member 17of the armed forces must complete, at the point of sale, a form 18prescribed by the Department of Revenue documenting that the 19transaction is eligible for the exemption under this 20paragraph. Retailers must keep the form as documentation of 21the exemption in their records for a period of not less than 6 22years. "Armed forces of the United States" means the United 23States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or 24Coast Guard. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 25Section 3-75. 26    (35) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals provided   HB1050- 47 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment is made by an 2intermediary, such as a Medicare Administrative Contractor, a 3Managed Care Organization, or a Medicare Advantage 4Organization, pursuant to a government contract. This 5paragraph (35) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. 6    (36) (35) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 7in Section 3-10, food prepared for immediate consumption and 8transferred incident to a sale of service subject to this Act 9or the Service Occupation Tax Act by an entity licensed under 10the Hospital Licensing Act, the Nursing Home Care Act, the 11Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the ID/DD Community 12Care Act, the MC/DD Act, the Specialized Mental Health 13Rehabilitation Act of 2013, or the Child Care Act of 1969, or 14by an entity that holds a permit issued pursuant to the Life 15Care Facilities Act. This item (36) (35) is exempt from the 16provisions of Section 3-75. 17    (37) (36) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 18in Section 3-10, food for human consumption that is to be 19consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 20alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 21use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 22prepared for immediate consumption). This item (37) (36) is 23exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. 24    (38) (35) Use by a lessee of the following leased tangible 25personal property:26        (1) software transferred subject to a license that   HB1050- 48 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    meets the following requirements:2            (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement signed 3        by the licensor and the customer;4                (i) an electronic agreement in which the 5            customer accepts the license by means of an 6            electronic signature that is verifiable and can be 7            authenticated and is attached to or made part of 8            the license will comply with this requirement;9                (ii) a license agreement in which the customer 10            electronically accepts the terms by clicking "I 11            agree" does not comply with this requirement;12            (B) it restricts the customer's duplication and 13        use of the software;14            (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 15        sublicensing, or transferring the software to a third 16        party (except to a related party) without the 17        permission and continued control of the licensor;18            (D) the licensor has a policy of providing another 19        copy at minimal or no charge if the customer loses or 20        damages the software, or of permitting the licensee to 21        make and keep an archival copy, and such policy is 22        either stated in the license agreement, supported by 23        the licensor's books and records, or supported by a 24        notarized statement made under penalties of perjury by 25        the licensor; and26            (E) the customer must destroy or return all copies   HB1050- 49 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1        of the software to the licensor at the end of the 2        license period; this provision is deemed to be met, in 3        the case of a perpetual license, without being set 4        forth in the license agreement; and5        (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 6    receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local government 7    if the ordinance imposing that tax was adopted prior to 8    January 1, 2023. 9    (39) On and after January 1, 2026, hearing aids. As used in 10this item (39), "hearing aid" means any wearable 11non-disposable, non-experimental instrument or device designed 12to aid or compensate for impaired human hearing and any parts, 13attachments, or accessories for the instrument or device, 14including an ear mold but excluding batteries and cords. This 15item (39) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. 16(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-700, Article 70, 17Section 70-10, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, Article 75, Section 1875-10, eff. 4-19-22; 102-1026, eff. 5-27-22; 103-9, Article 5, 19Section 5-10, eff. 6-7-23; 103-9, Article 15, Section 15-10, 20eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 21103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 227-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995, 23eff. 8-9-24; revised 11-26-24.) 24    Section 15. The Service Occupation Tax Act is amended by 25changing Section 3-5 as follows:   HB1050- 50 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    (35 ILCS 115/3-5)2    Sec. 3-5. Exemptions. The following tangible personal 3property is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act:4    (1) Personal property sold by a corporation, society, 5association, foundation, institution, or organization, other 6than a limited liability company, that is organized and 7operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise for the 8benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the personal 9property was not purchased by the enterprise for the purpose 10of resale by the enterprise.11    (2) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit 12Illinois county fair association for use in conducting, 13operating, or promoting the county fair.14    (3) Personal property purchased by any not-for-profit arts 15or cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 16by the Department by rule, that it has received an exemption 17under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that 18is organized and operated primarily for the presentation or 19support of arts or cultural programming, activities, or 20services. These organizations include, but are not limited to, 21music and dramatic arts organizations such as symphony 22orchestras and theatrical groups, arts and cultural service 23organizations, local arts councils, visual arts organizations, 24and media arts organizations. On and after July 1, 2001 (the 25effective date of Public Act 92-35), however, an entity   HB1050- 51 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1otherwise eligible for this exemption shall not make tax-free 2purchases unless it has an active identification number issued 3by the Department.4    (4) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or silver 5coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the government of the 6United States of America, or the government of any foreign 7country, and bullion.8    (5) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again on September 1, 92004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery and 10equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both new 11and used, and including that manufactured on special order or 12purchased for lease, certified by the purchaser to be used 13primarily for graphic arts production. Equipment includes 14chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts but only if the 15chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts effect a direct and 16immediate change upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on 17July 1, 2017, graphic arts machinery and equipment is included 18in the manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 19exemption under Section 2 of this Act.20    (6) Personal property sold by a teacher-sponsored student 21organization affiliated with an elementary or secondary school 22located in Illinois.23    (7) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 24including that manufactured on special order, certified by the 25purchaser to be used primarily for production agriculture or 26State or federal agricultural programs, including individual   HB1050- 52 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1replacement parts for the machinery and equipment, including 2machinery and equipment purchased for lease, and including 3implements of husbandry defined in Section 1-130 of the 4Illinois Vehicle Code, farm machinery and agricultural 5chemical and fertilizer spreaders, and nurse wagons required 6to be registered under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle 7Code, but excluding other motor vehicles required to be 8registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural 9polyhouses or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 10overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery and 11equipment under this item (7). Agricultural chemical tender 12tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold separately from a 13motor vehicle required to be licensed and units sold mounted 14on a motor vehicle required to be licensed if the selling price 15of the tender is separately stated.16    Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 17farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 18installed on farm machinery and equipment, including, but not 19limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, seeders, 20or spreaders. Precision farming equipment includes, but is not 21limited to, soil testing sensors, computers, monitors, 22software, global positioning and mapping systems, and other 23such equipment.24    Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 25sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in the 26computer-assisted operation of production agriculture   HB1050- 53 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not limited 2to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of animal and 3crop data for the purpose of formulating animal diets and 4agricultural chemicals. 5    Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and equipment 6also includes electrical power generation equipment used 7primarily for production agriculture. 8    This item (7) is exempt from the provisions of Section 93-55.10    (8) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 11to or used by an air common carrier, certified by the carrier 12to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 13conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a flight 14destined for or returning from a location or locations outside 15the United States without regard to previous or subsequent 16domestic stopovers.17    Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 18to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier to be 19used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the conduct of 20its business as an air common carrier, for a flight that (i) is 21engaged in foreign trade or is engaged in trade between the 22United States and any of its possessions and (ii) transports 23at least one individual or package for hire from the city of 24origination to the city of final destination on the same 25aircraft, without regard to a change in the flight number of 26that aircraft.   HB1050- 54 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    (9) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 2stated on customers' bills for the purchase and consumption of 3food and beverages, to the extent that the proceeds of the 4service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a 5substitute for tips to the employees who participate directly 6in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the food or 7beverage function with respect to which the service charge is 8imposed.9    (10) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, drilling, 10and production equipment, including (i) rigs and parts of 11rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover rigs, (ii) 12pipe and tubular goods, including casing and drill strings, 13(iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) storage tanks and flow 14lines, (v) any individual replacement part for oil field 15exploration, drilling, and production equipment, and (vi) 16machinery and equipment purchased for lease; but excluding 17motor vehicles required to be registered under the Illinois 18Vehicle Code.19    (11) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, including 20repair and replacement parts, both new and used, including 21that manufactured on special order, certified by the purchaser 22to be used primarily for photoprocessing, and including 23photoprocessing machinery and equipment purchased for lease.24    (12) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate exploration, 25mining, off-highway hauling, processing, maintenance, and 26reclamation equipment, including replacement parts and   HB1050- 55 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1equipment, and including equipment purchased for lease, but 2excluding motor vehicles required to be registered under the 3Illinois Vehicle Code. The changes made to this Section by 4Public Act 97-767 apply on and after July 1, 2003, but no claim 5for credit or refund is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 6(the effective date of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid 7during the period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 816, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).9    (13) Beginning January 1, 1992 and through June 30, 2016, 10food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 11premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 12soft drinks and food that has been prepared for immediate 13consumption) and prescription and non-prescription medicines, 14drugs, medical appliances, and insulin, urine testing 15materials, syringes, and needles used by diabetics, for human 16use, when purchased for use by a person receiving medical 17assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code who 18resides in a licensed long-term care facility, as defined in 19the Nursing Home Care Act, or in a licensed facility as defined 20in the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the 21Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.22    (14) Semen used for artificial insemination of livestock 23for direct agricultural production.24    (15) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with and 25meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse Club 26Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American Quarter   HB1050- 56 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1Horse Association, United States Trotting Association, or 2Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for purposes of breeding or 3racing for prizes. This item (15) is exempt from the 4provisions of Section 3-55, and the exemption provided for 5under this item (15) applies for all periods beginning May 30, 61995, but no claim for credit or refund is allowed on or after 7January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for 8such taxes paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and 9ending on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 1095-88).11    (16) Computers and communications equipment utilized for 12any hospital purpose and equipment used in the diagnosis, 13analysis, or treatment of hospital patients sold to a lessor 14who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or longer 15executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 16hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 17identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 18the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act.19    (17) Personal property sold to a lessor who leases the 20property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or in 21effect at the time of the purchase, to a governmental body that 22has been issued an active tax exemption identification number 23by the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' 24Occupation Tax Act.25    (18) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 26December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or   HB1050- 57 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1before December 31, 2004, personal property that is donated 2for disaster relief to be used in a State or federally declared 3disaster area in Illinois or bordering Illinois by a 4manufacturer or retailer that is registered in this State to a 5corporation, society, association, foundation, or institution 6that has been issued a sales tax exemption identification 7number by the Department that assists victims of the disaster 8who reside within the declared disaster area.9    (19) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 10December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 11before December 31, 2004, personal property that is used in 12the performance of infrastructure repairs in this State, 13including, but not limited to, municipal roads and streets, 14access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal systems, 15water and sewer line extensions, water distribution and 16purification facilities, storm water drainage and retention 17facilities, and sewage treatment facilities, resulting from a 18State or federally declared disaster in Illinois or bordering 19Illinois when such repairs are initiated on facilities located 20in the declared disaster area within 6 months after the 21disaster.22    (20) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds sold at a 23"game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that term is used 24in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is exempt from the 25provisions of Section 3-55.26    (21) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in Section   HB1050- 58 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b11-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is donated to a 2corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 3foundation, or institution that is determined by the 4Department to be organized and operated exclusively for 5educational purposes. For purposes of this exemption, "a 6corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 7foundation, or institution organized and operated exclusively 8for educational purposes" means all tax-supported public 9schools, private schools that offer systematic instruction in 10useful branches of learning by methods common to public 11schools and that compare favorably in their scope and 12intensity with the course of study presented in tax-supported 13schools, and vocational or technical schools or institutes 14organized and operated exclusively to provide a course of 15study of not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 16individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 17technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 18occupation.19    (22) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 20including food, purchased through fundraising events for the 21benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary school, 22a group of those schools, or one or more school districts if 23the events are sponsored by an entity recognized by the school 24district that consists primarily of volunteers and includes 25parents and teachers of the school children. This paragraph 26does not apply to fundraising events (i) for the benefit of   HB1050- 59 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1private home instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising 2entity purchases the personal property sold at the events from 3another individual or entity that sold the property for the 4purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that profits 5from the sale to the fundraising entity. This paragraph is 6exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55.7    (23) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 31, 82001, new or used automatic vending machines that prepare and 9serve hot food and beverages, including coffee, soup, and 10other items, and replacement parts for these machines. 11Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2003, machines 12and parts for machines used in commercial, coin-operated 13amusement and vending business if a use or occupation tax is 14paid on the gross receipts derived from the use of the 15commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending machines. This 16paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55.17    (24) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 18Public Act 92-227), computers and communications equipment 19utilized for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 20diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients sold to 21a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or 22longer executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 23hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 24identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 25the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt 26from the provisions of Section 3-55.  HB1050- 60 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    (25) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 2Public Act 92-227), personal property sold to a lessor who 3leases the property, under a lease of one year or longer 4executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 5governmental body that has been issued an active tax exemption 6identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 7the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt 8from the provisions of Section 3-55.9    (26) Beginning on January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 102016, tangible personal property purchased from an Illinois 11retailer by a taxpayer engaged in centralized purchasing 12activities in Illinois who will, upon receipt of the property 13in Illinois, temporarily store the property in Illinois (i) 14for the purpose of subsequently transporting it outside this 15State for use or consumption thereafter solely outside this 16State or (ii) for the purpose of being processed, fabricated, 17or manufactured into, attached to, or incorporated into other 18tangible personal property to be transported outside this 19State and thereafter used or consumed solely outside this 20State. The Director of Revenue shall, pursuant to rules 21adopted in accordance with the Illinois Administrative 22Procedure Act, issue a permit to any taxpayer in good standing 23with the Department who is eligible for the exemption under 24this paragraph (26). The permit issued under this paragraph 25(26) shall authorize the holder, to the extent and in the 26manner specified in the rules adopted under this Act, to   HB1050- 61 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1purchase tangible personal property from a retailer exempt 2from the taxes imposed by this Act. Taxpayers shall maintain 3all necessary books and records to substantiate the use and 4consumption of all such tangible personal property outside of 5the State of Illinois.6    (27) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal property 7used in the construction or maintenance of a community water 8supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of the Environmental 9Protection Act, that is operated by a not-for-profit 10corporation that holds a valid water supply permit issued 11under Title IV of the Environmental Protection Act. This 12paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 13    (28) Tangible personal property sold to a 14public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 1511-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 16constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, but 17only if the legal title to the municipal convention hall is 18transferred to the municipality without any further 19consideration by or on behalf of the municipality at the time 20of the completion of the municipal convention hall or upon the 21retirement or redemption of any bonds or other debt 22instruments issued by the public-facilities corporation in 23connection with the development of the municipal convention 24hall. This exemption includes existing public-facilities 25corporations as provided in Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois 26Municipal Code. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions   HB1050- 62 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1of Section 3-55. 2    (29) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 3December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, components, 4and furnishings incorporated into or upon an aircraft as part 5of the modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, 6repair, or maintenance of the aircraft. This exemption 7includes consumable supplies used in the modification, 8refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, and 9maintenance of aircraft. However, until January 1, 2024, this 10exemption excludes any materials, parts, equipment, 11components, and consumable supplies used in the modification, 12replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 13power plants, whether such engines or power plants are 14installed or uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable 15supplies" include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 16sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 17latex gloves, and protective films. 18    Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through December 1931, 2023, this exemption applies only to the transfer of 20qualifying tangible personal property incident to the 21modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, 22or maintenance of an aircraft by persons who (i) hold an Air 23Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an approved 24repair station by the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) 25have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in 26accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations.   HB1050- 63 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1The exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 2commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 3service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or Part 4129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. From January 1, 2024 5through December 31, 2029, this exemption applies only to the 6transfer of qualifying tangible personal property incident to: 7(A) the modification, refurbishment, completion, repair, 8replacement, or maintenance of an aircraft by persons who (i) 9hold an Air Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 10approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 11Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct 12operations in accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation 13Regulations; and (B) the modification, replacement, repair, 14and maintenance of aircraft engines or power plants without 15regard to whether or not those persons meet the qualifications 16of item (A).17    The changes made to this paragraph (29) by Public Act 1898-534 are declarative of existing law. It is the intent of the 19General Assembly that the exemption under this paragraph (29) 20applies continuously from January 1, 2010 through December 31, 212024; however, no claim for credit or refund is allowed for 22taxes paid as a result of the disallowance of this exemption on 23or after January 1, 2015 and prior to February 5, 2020 (the 24effective date of Public Act 101-629).25    (30) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 31, 262026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups.   HB1050- 64 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    (31) Tangible personal property transferred to a purchaser 2who is exempt from tax by operation of federal law. This 3paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 4    (32) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 5construction or operation of a data center that has been 6granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 7Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 8personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 9tenant of the data center or by a contractor or subcontractor 10of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data centers that would 11have qualified for a certificate of exemption prior to January 121, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 been in effect, may apply for and 13obtain an exemption for subsequent purchases of computer 14equipment or enabling software purchased or leased to upgrade, 15supplement, or replace computer equipment or enabling software 16purchased or leased in the original investment that would have 17qualified. 18    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall 19grant a certificate of exemption under this item (32) to 20qualified data centers as defined by Section 605-1025 of the 21Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the 22Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 23    For the purposes of this item (32): 24        "Data center" means a building or a series of 25    buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house working 26    servers in one physical location or multiple sites within   HB1050- 65 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    the State of Illinois. 2        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 3    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 4    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 5    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 6    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 7    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets; 8    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 9    systems; peripheral components or systems; software; 10    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery 11    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 12    systems; other cabling; and other data center 13    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate 14    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures; 15    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 16    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and 17    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to 18    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage 19    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible 20    personal property; and all other tangible personal 21    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 22    data center. The term "qualified tangible personal 23    property" also includes building materials physically 24    incorporated into the qualifying data center. To document 25    the exemption allowed under this Section, the retailer 26    must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the certificate   HB1050- 66 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    of eligibility issued by the Department of Commerce and 2    Economic Opportunity. 3    This item (32) is exempt from the provisions of Section 43-55. 5    (33) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 6collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. This 7item (33) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. As 8used in this item (33): 9        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 10    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 11    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 12    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 13    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 14    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 15    time of sale. 16        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 17    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 18    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 19    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 20    milk until it is ready for consumption. 21        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 22    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 23    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 24    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 25    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 26    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast   HB1050- 67 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    milk storage bags. 2        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 3    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 4    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 5    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 6    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 7    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 8    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 9    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 10    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 11    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 12    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 13    or distributor. 14        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 15    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 16    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 17    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 18    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 19    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 20    manufacturer or distributor. 21    (34) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf of 22the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 23Property Act. This item (34) is exempt from the provisions of 24Section 3-55.25    (35) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 26property purchased by an active duty member of the armed   HB1050- 68 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1forces of the United States who presents valid military 2identification and purchases the property using a form of 3payment where the federal government is the payor. The member 4of the armed forces must complete, at the point of sale, a form 5prescribed by the Department of Revenue documenting that the 6transaction is eligible for the exemption under this 7paragraph. Retailers must keep the form as documentation of 8the exemption in their records for a period of not less than 6 9years. "Armed forces of the United States" means the United 10States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or 11Coast Guard. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 12Section 3-55. 13    (36) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals provided 14to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment is made by an 15intermediary, such as a Medicare Administrative Contractor, a 16Managed Care Organization, or a Medicare Advantage 17Organization, pursuant to a government contract. This 18paragraph (36) (35) is exempt from the provisions of Section 193-55. 20    (37) (36) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 21in Section 3-10, food prepared for immediate consumption and 22transferred incident to a sale of service subject to this Act 23or the Service Use Tax Act by an entity licensed under the 24Hospital Licensing Act, the Nursing Home Care Act, the 25Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the ID/DD Community 26Care Act, the MC/DD Act, the Specialized Mental Health   HB1050- 69 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1Rehabilitation Act of 2013, or the Child Care Act of 1969 or by 2an entity that holds a permit issued pursuant to the Life Care 3Facilities Act. This item (37) (36) is exempt from the 4provisions of Section 3-55. 5    (38) (37) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 6in Section 3-10, food for human consumption that is to be 7consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 8alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 9use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 10prepared for immediate consumption). This item (38) (37) is 11exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 12    (39) (36) The lease of the following tangible personal 13property:14        (1) computer software transferred subject to a license 15    that meets the following requirements:16            (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement signed 17        by the licensor and the customer;18                (i) an electronic agreement in which the 19            customer accepts the license by means of an 20            electronic signature that is verifiable and can be 21            authenticated and is attached to or made part of 22            the license will comply with this requirement;23                (ii) a license agreement in which the customer 24            electronically accepts the terms by clicking "I 25            agree" does not comply with this requirement;26            (B) it restricts the customer's duplication and   HB1050- 70 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1        use of the software;2            (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 3        sublicensing, or transferring the software to a third 4        party (except to a related party) without the 5        permission and continued control of the licensor;6            (D) the licensor has a policy of providing another 7        copy at minimal or no charge if the customer loses or 8        damages the software, or of permitting the licensee to 9        make and keep an archival copy, and such policy is 10        either stated in the license agreement, supported by 11        the licensor's books and records, or supported by a 12        notarized statement made under penalties of perjury by 13        the licensor; and14            (E) the customer must destroy or return all copies 15        of the software to the licensor at the end of the 16        license period; this provision is deemed to be met, in 17        the case of a perpetual license, without being set 18        forth in the license agreement; and19        (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 20    receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local government 21    if the ordinance imposing that tax was adopted prior to 22    January 1, 2023. 23    (40) On and after January 1, 2026, hearing aids. As used in 24this item (40), "hearing aid" means any wearable 25non-disposable, non-experimental instrument or device designed 26to aid or compensate for impaired human hearing and any parts,   HB1050- 71 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1attachments, or accessories for the instrument or device, 2including an ear mold but excluding batteries and cords. This 3item (40) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 4(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-700, Article 70, 5Section 70-15, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, Article 75, Section 675-15, eff. 4-19-22; 102-1026, eff. 5-27-22; 103-9, Article 5, 7Section 5-15, eff. 6-7-23; 103-9, Article 15, Section 15-15, 8eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 9103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 107-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995, 11eff. 8-9-24; revised 11-26-24.) 12    Section 20. The Retailers' Occupation Tax Act is amended 13by changing Section 2-5 as follows: 14    (35 ILCS 120/2-5)15    Sec. 2-5. Exemptions. Gross receipts from proceeds from 16the sale, which, on and after January 1, 2025, includes the 17lease, of the following tangible personal property are exempt 18from the tax imposed by this Act:19        (1) Farm chemicals.20        (2) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 21    including that manufactured on special order, certified by 22    the purchaser to be used primarily for production 23    agriculture or State or federal agricultural programs, 24    including individual replacement parts for the machinery   HB1050- 72 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    and equipment, including machinery and equipment purchased 2    for lease, and including implements of husbandry defined 3    in Section 1-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, farm 4    machinery and agricultural chemical and fertilizer 5    spreaders, and nurse wagons required to be registered 6    under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, but 7    excluding other motor vehicles required to be registered 8    under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural polyhouses 9    or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 10    overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery 11    and equipment under this item (2). Agricultural chemical 12    tender tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold 13    separately from a motor vehicle required to be licensed 14    and units sold mounted on a motor vehicle required to be 15    licensed, if the selling price of the tender is separately 16    stated.17        Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 18    farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 19    installed on farm machinery and equipment including, but 20    not limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, 21    seeders, or spreaders. Precision farming equipment 22    includes, but is not limited to, soil testing sensors, 23    computers, monitors, software, global positioning and 24    mapping systems, and other such equipment.25        Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 26    sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in   HB1050- 73 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    the computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 2    facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not 3    limited to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of 4    animal and crop data for the purpose of formulating animal 5    diets and agricultural chemicals. 6        Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and 7    equipment also includes electrical power generation 8    equipment used primarily for production agriculture. 9        This item (2) is exempt from the provisions of Section 10    2-70.11        (3) Until July 1, 2003, distillation machinery and 12    equipment, sold as a unit or kit, assembled or installed 13    by the retailer, certified by the user to be used only for 14    the production of ethyl alcohol that will be used for 15    consumption as motor fuel or as a component of motor fuel 16    for the personal use of the user, and not subject to sale 17    or resale.18        (4) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again September 19    1, 2004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery 20    and equipment, including repair and replacement parts, 21    both new and used, and including that manufactured on 22    special order or purchased for lease, certified by the 23    purchaser to be used primarily for graphic arts 24    production. Equipment includes chemicals or chemicals 25    acting as catalysts but only if the chemicals or chemicals 26    acting as catalysts effect a direct and immediate change   HB1050- 74 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on July 1, 2017, 2    graphic arts machinery and equipment is included in the 3    manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 4    exemption under paragraph (14).5        (5) A motor vehicle that is used for automobile 6    renting, as defined in the Automobile Renting Occupation 7    and Use Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt from the 8    provisions of Section 2-70.9        (6) Personal property sold by a teacher-sponsored 10    student organization affiliated with an elementary or 11    secondary school located in Illinois.12        (7) Until July 1, 2003, proceeds of that portion of 13    the selling price of a passenger car the sale of which is 14    subject to the Replacement Vehicle Tax.15        (8) Personal property sold to an Illinois county fair 16    association for use in conducting, operating, or promoting 17    the county fair.18        (9) Personal property sold to a not-for-profit arts or 19    cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 20    by the Department by rule, that it has received an 21    exemption under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue 22    Code and that is organized and operated primarily for the 23    presentation or support of arts or cultural programming, 24    activities, or services. These organizations include, but 25    are not limited to, music and dramatic arts organizations 26    such as symphony orchestras and theatrical groups, arts   HB1050- 75 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    and cultural service organizations, local arts councils, 2    visual arts organizations, and media arts organizations. 3    On and after July 1, 2001 (the effective date of Public Act 4    92-35), however, an entity otherwise eligible for this 5    exemption shall not make tax-free purchases unless it has 6    an active identification number issued by the Department.7        (10) Personal property sold by a corporation, society, 8    association, foundation, institution, or organization, 9    other than a limited liability company, that is organized 10    and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise for 11    the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 12    personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for 13    the purpose of resale by the enterprise.14        (11) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, 15    personal property sold to a governmental body, to a 16    corporation, society, association, foundation, or 17    institution organized and operated exclusively for 18    charitable, religious, or educational purposes, or to a 19    not-for-profit corporation, society, association, 20    foundation, institution, or organization that has no 21    compensated officers or employees and that is organized 22    and operated primarily for the recreation of persons 55 23    years of age or older. A limited liability company may 24    qualify for the exemption under this paragraph only if the 25    limited liability company is organized and operated 26    exclusively for educational purposes. On and after July 1,   HB1050- 76 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    1987, however, no entity otherwise eligible for this 2    exemption shall make tax-free purchases unless it has an 3    active identification number issued by the Department.4        (12) (Blank).5        (12-5) On and after July 1, 2003 and through June 30, 6    2004, motor vehicles of the second division with a gross 7    vehicle weight in excess of 8,000 pounds that are subject 8    to the commercial distribution fee imposed under Section 9    3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. Beginning on July 1, 10    2004 and through June 30, 2005, the use in this State of 11    motor vehicles of the second division: (i) with a gross 12    vehicle weight rating in excess of 8,000 pounds; (ii) that 13    are subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed 14    under Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; and 15    (iii) that are primarily used for commercial purposes. 16    Through June 30, 2005, this exemption applies to repair 17    and replacement parts added after the initial purchase of 18    such a motor vehicle if that motor vehicle is used in a 19    manner that would qualify for the rolling stock exemption 20    otherwise provided for in this Act. For purposes of this 21    paragraph, "used for commercial purposes" means the 22    transportation of persons or property in furtherance of 23    any commercial or industrial enterprise whether for-hire 24    or not. 25        (13) Proceeds from sales to owners or lessors, 26    lessees, or shippers of tangible personal property that is   HB1050- 77 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    utilized by interstate carriers for hire for use as 2    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce and equipment 3    operated by a telecommunications provider, licensed as a 4    common carrier by the Federal Communications Commission, 5    which is permanently installed in or affixed to aircraft 6    moving in interstate commerce.7        (14) Machinery and equipment that will be used by the 8    purchaser, or a lessee of the purchaser, primarily in the 9    process of manufacturing or assembling tangible personal 10    property for wholesale or retail sale or lease, whether 11    the sale or lease is made directly by the manufacturer or 12    by some other person, whether the materials used in the 13    process are owned by the manufacturer or some other 14    person, or whether the sale or lease is made apart from or 15    as an incident to the seller's engaging in the service 16    occupation of producing machines, tools, dies, jigs, 17    patterns, gauges, or other similar items of no commercial 18    value on special order for a particular purchaser. The 19    exemption provided by this paragraph (14) does not include 20    machinery and equipment used in (i) the generation of 21    electricity for wholesale or retail sale; (ii) the 22    generation or treatment of natural or artificial gas for 23    wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to customers 24    through pipes, pipelines, or mains; or (iii) the treatment 25    of water for wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to 26    customers through pipes, pipelines, or mains. The   HB1050- 78 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    provisions of Public Act 98-583 are declaratory of 2    existing law as to the meaning and scope of this 3    exemption. Beginning on July 1, 2017, the exemption 4    provided by this paragraph (14) includes, but is not 5    limited to, graphic arts machinery and equipment, as 6    defined in paragraph (4) of this Section.7        (15) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 8    stated on customers' bills for purchase and consumption of 9    food and beverages, to the extent that the proceeds of the 10    service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a 11    substitute for tips to the employees who participate 12    directly in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the 13    food or beverage function with respect to which the 14    service charge is imposed. 15        (16) Tangible personal property sold to a purchaser if 16    the purchaser is exempt from use tax by operation of 17    federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 18    of Section 2-70. 19        (17) Tangible personal property sold to a common 20    carrier by rail or motor that receives the physical 21    possession of the property in Illinois and that transports 22    the property, or shares with another common carrier in the 23    transportation of the property, out of Illinois on a 24    standard uniform bill of lading showing the seller of the 25    property as the shipper or consignor of the property to a 26    destination outside Illinois, for use outside Illinois.  HB1050- 79 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1        (18) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or 2    silver coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the 3    government of the United States of America, or the 4    government of any foreign country, and bullion.5        (19) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, 6    drilling, and production equipment, including (i) rigs and 7    parts of rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover 8    rigs, (ii) pipe and tubular goods, including casing and 9    drill strings, (iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) 10    storage tanks and flow lines, (v) any individual 11    replacement part for oil field exploration, drilling, and 12    production equipment, and (vi) machinery and equipment 13    purchased for lease; but excluding motor vehicles required 14    to be registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code.15        (20) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, 16    including repair and replacement parts, both new and used, 17    including that manufactured on special order, certified by 18    the purchaser to be used primarily for photoprocessing, 19    and including photoprocessing machinery and equipment 20    purchased for lease.21        (21) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate 22    exploration, mining, off-highway hauling, processing, 23    maintenance, and reclamation equipment, including 24    replacement parts and equipment, and including equipment 25    purchased for lease, but excluding motor vehicles required 26    to be registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. The   HB1050- 80 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    changes made to this Section by Public Act 97-767 apply on 2    and after July 1, 2003, but no claim for credit or refund 3    is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 (the effective date 4    of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid during the 5    period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 16, 6    2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).7        (22) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products 8    sold to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier 9    to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 10    conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a 11    flight destined for or returning from a location or 12    locations outside the United States without regard to 13    previous or subsequent domestic stopovers.14        Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products 15    sold to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier 16    to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 17    conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a 18    flight that (i) is engaged in foreign trade or is engaged 19    in trade between the United States and any of its 20    possessions and (ii) transports at least one individual or 21    package for hire from the city of origination to the city 22    of final destination on the same aircraft, without regard 23    to a change in the flight number of that aircraft. 24        (23) A transaction in which the purchase order is 25    received by a florist who is located outside Illinois, but 26    who has a florist located in Illinois deliver the property   HB1050- 81 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    to the purchaser or the purchaser's donee in Illinois.2        (24) Fuel consumed or used in the operation of ships, 3    barges, or vessels that are used primarily in or for the 4    transportation of property or the conveyance of persons 5    for hire on rivers bordering on this State if the fuel is 6    delivered by the seller to the purchaser's barge, ship, or 7    vessel while it is afloat upon that bordering river.8        (25) Except as provided in item (25-5) of this 9    Section, a motor vehicle sold in this State to a 10    nonresident even though the motor vehicle is delivered to 11    the nonresident in this State, if the motor vehicle is not 12    to be titled in this State, and if a drive-away permit is 13    issued to the motor vehicle as provided in Section 3-603 14    of the Illinois Vehicle Code or if the nonresident 15    purchaser has vehicle registration plates to transfer to 16    the motor vehicle upon returning to his or her home state. 17    The issuance of the drive-away permit or having the 18    out-of-state registration plates to be transferred is 19    prima facie evidence that the motor vehicle will not be 20    titled in this State.21        (25-5) The exemption under item (25) does not apply if 22    the state in which the motor vehicle will be titled does 23    not allow a reciprocal exemption for a motor vehicle sold 24    and delivered in that state to an Illinois resident but 25    titled in Illinois. The tax collected under this Act on 26    the sale of a motor vehicle in this State to a resident of   HB1050- 82 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    another state that does not allow a reciprocal exemption 2    shall be imposed at a rate equal to the state's rate of tax 3    on taxable property in the state in which the purchaser is 4    a resident, except that the tax shall not exceed the tax 5    that would otherwise be imposed under this Act. At the 6    time of the sale, the purchaser shall execute a statement, 7    signed under penalty of perjury, of his or her intent to 8    title the vehicle in the state in which the purchaser is a 9    resident within 30 days after the sale and of the fact of 10    the payment to the State of Illinois of tax in an amount 11    equivalent to the state's rate of tax on taxable property 12    in his or her state of residence and shall submit the 13    statement to the appropriate tax collection agency in his 14    or her state of residence. In addition, the retailer must 15    retain a signed copy of the statement in his or her 16    records. Nothing in this item shall be construed to 17    require the removal of the vehicle from this state 18    following the filing of an intent to title the vehicle in 19    the purchaser's state of residence if the purchaser titles 20    the vehicle in his or her state of residence within 30 days 21    after the date of sale. The tax collected under this Act in 22    accordance with this item (25-5) shall be proportionately 23    distributed as if the tax were collected at the 6.25% 24    general rate imposed under this Act. 25        (25-7) Beginning on July 1, 2007, no tax is imposed 26    under this Act on the sale of an aircraft, as defined in   HB1050- 83 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    Section 3 of the Illinois Aeronautics Act, if all of the 2    following conditions are met:3            (1) the aircraft leaves this State within 15 days 4        after the later of either the issuance of the final 5        billing for the sale of the aircraft, or the 6        authorized approval for return to service, completion 7        of the maintenance record entry, and completion of the 8        test flight and ground test for inspection, as 9        required by 14 CFR 91.407;10            (2) the aircraft is not based or registered in 11        this State after the sale of the aircraft; and12            (3) the seller retains in his or her books and 13        records and provides to the Department a signed and 14        dated certification from the purchaser, on a form 15        prescribed by the Department, certifying that the 16        requirements of this item (25-7) are met. The 17        certificate must also include the name and address of 18        the purchaser, the address of the location where the 19        aircraft is to be titled or registered, the address of 20        the primary physical location of the aircraft, and 21        other information that the Department may reasonably 22        require.23        For purposes of this item (25-7):24        "Based in this State" means hangared, stored, or 25    otherwise used, excluding post-sale customizations as 26    defined in this Section, for 10 or more days in each   HB1050- 84 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    12-month period immediately following the date of the sale 2    of the aircraft.3        "Registered in this State" means an aircraft 4    registered with the Department of Transportation, 5    Aeronautics Division, or titled or registered with the 6    Federal Aviation Administration to an address located in 7    this State.8        This paragraph (25-7) is exempt from the provisions of 9    Section 2-70. 10        (26) Semen used for artificial insemination of 11    livestock for direct agricultural production.12        (27) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with 13    and meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse 14    Club Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American 15    Quarter Horse Association, United States Trotting 16    Association, or Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for 17    purposes of breeding or racing for prizes. This item (27) 18    is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70, and the 19    exemption provided for under this item (27) applies for 20    all periods beginning May 30, 1995, but no claim for 21    credit or refund is allowed on or after January 1, 2008 22    (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for such taxes 23    paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and ending 24    on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 25    95-88).26        (28) Computers and communications equipment utilized   HB1050- 85 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 2    diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients 3    sold to a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of 4    one year or longer executed or in effect at the time of the 5    purchase, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax 6    exemption identification number by the Department under 7    Section 1g of this Act.8        (29) Personal property sold to a lessor who leases the 9    property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 10    in effect at the time of the purchase, to a governmental 11    body that has been issued an active tax exemption 12    identification number by the Department under Section 1g 13    of this Act.14        (30) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 15    December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on 16    or before December 31, 2004, personal property that is 17    donated for disaster relief to be used in a State or 18    federally declared disaster area in Illinois or bordering 19    Illinois by a manufacturer or retailer that is registered 20    in this State to a corporation, society, association, 21    foundation, or institution that has been issued a sales 22    tax exemption identification number by the Department that 23    assists victims of the disaster who reside within the 24    declared disaster area.25        (31) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 26    December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on   HB1050- 86 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    or before December 31, 2004, personal property that is 2    used in the performance of infrastructure repairs in this 3    State, including, but not limited to, municipal roads and 4    streets, access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal 5    systems, water and sewer line extensions, water 6    distribution and purification facilities, storm water 7    drainage and retention facilities, and sewage treatment 8    facilities, resulting from a State or federally declared 9    disaster in Illinois or bordering Illinois when such 10    repairs are initiated on facilities located in the 11    declared disaster area within 6 months after the disaster.12        (32) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds sold 13    at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that 14    term is used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is 15    exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.16        (33) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in 17    Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is 18    donated to a corporation, limited liability company, 19    society, association, foundation, or institution that is 20    determined by the Department to be organized and operated 21    exclusively for educational purposes. For purposes of this 22    exemption, "a corporation, limited liability company, 23    society, association, foundation, or institution organized 24    and operated exclusively for educational purposes" means 25    all tax-supported public schools, private schools that 26    offer systematic instruction in useful branches of   HB1050- 87 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    learning by methods common to public schools and that 2    compare favorably in their scope and intensity with the 3    course of study presented in tax-supported schools, and 4    vocational or technical schools or institutes organized 5    and operated exclusively to provide a course of study of 6    not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 7    individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 8    technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 9    occupation.10        (34) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 11    including food, purchased through fundraising events for 12    the benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary 13    school, a group of those schools, or one or more school 14    districts if the events are sponsored by an entity 15    recognized by the school district that consists primarily 16    of volunteers and includes parents and teachers of the 17    school children. This paragraph does not apply to 18    fundraising events (i) for the benefit of private home 19    instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising entity 20    purchases the personal property sold at the events from 21    another individual or entity that sold the property for 22    the purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that 23    profits from the sale to the fundraising entity. This 24    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.25        (35) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 26    31, 2001, new or used automatic vending machines that   HB1050- 88 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    prepare and serve hot food and beverages, including 2    coffee, soup, and other items, and replacement parts for 3    these machines. Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 4    30, 2003, machines and parts for machines used in 5    commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending business 6    if a use or occupation tax is paid on the gross receipts 7    derived from the use of the commercial, coin-operated 8    amusement and vending machines. This paragraph is exempt 9    from the provisions of Section 2-70.10        (35-5) Beginning August 23, 2001 and through June 30, 11    2016, food for human consumption that is to be consumed 12    off the premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic 13    beverages, soft drinks, and food that has been prepared 14    for immediate consumption) and prescription and 15    nonprescription medicines, drugs, medical appliances, and 16    insulin, urine testing materials, syringes, and needles 17    used by diabetics, for human use, when purchased for use 18    by a person receiving medical assistance under Article V 19    of the Illinois Public Aid Code who resides in a licensed 20    long-term care facility, as defined in the Nursing Home 21    Care Act, or a licensed facility as defined in the ID/DD 22    Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the Specialized 23    Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.24        (36) Beginning August 2, 2001, computers and 25    communications equipment utilized for any hospital purpose 26    and equipment used in the diagnosis, analysis, or   HB1050- 89 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    treatment of hospital patients sold to a lessor who leases 2    the equipment, under a lease of one year or longer 3    executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 4    hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 5    identification number by the Department under Section 1g 6    of this Act. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 7    of Section 2-70.8        (37) Beginning August 2, 2001, personal property sold 9    to a lessor who leases the property, under a lease of one 10    year or longer executed or in effect at the time of the 11    purchase, to a governmental body that has been issued an 12    active tax exemption identification number by the 13    Department under Section 1g of this Act. This paragraph is 14    exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.15        (38) Beginning on January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 16    2016, tangible personal property purchased from an 17    Illinois retailer by a taxpayer engaged in centralized 18    purchasing activities in Illinois who will, upon receipt 19    of the property in Illinois, temporarily store the 20    property in Illinois (i) for the purpose of subsequently 21    transporting it outside this State for use or consumption 22    thereafter solely outside this State or (ii) for the 23    purpose of being processed, fabricated, or manufactured 24    into, attached to, or incorporated into other tangible 25    personal property to be transported outside this State and 26    thereafter used or consumed solely outside this State. The   HB1050- 90 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    Director of Revenue shall, pursuant to rules adopted in 2    accordance with the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, 3    issue a permit to any taxpayer in good standing with the 4    Department who is eligible for the exemption under this 5    paragraph (38). The permit issued under this paragraph 6    (38) shall authorize the holder, to the extent and in the 7    manner specified in the rules adopted under this Act, to 8    purchase tangible personal property from a retailer exempt 9    from the taxes imposed by this Act. Taxpayers shall 10    maintain all necessary books and records to substantiate 11    the use and consumption of all such tangible personal 12    property outside of the State of Illinois.13        (39) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal 14    property used in the construction or maintenance of a 15    community water supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of 16    the Environmental Protection Act, that is operated by a 17    not-for-profit corporation that holds a valid water supply 18    permit issued under Title IV of the Environmental 19    Protection Act. This paragraph is exempt from the 20    provisions of Section 2-70. 21        (40) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 22    December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, 23    components, and furnishings incorporated into or upon an 24    aircraft as part of the modification, refurbishment, 25    completion, replacement, repair, or maintenance of the 26    aircraft. This exemption includes consumable supplies used   HB1050- 91 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    in the modification, refurbishment, completion, 2    replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft. However, 3    until January 1, 2024, this exemption excludes any 4    materials, parts, equipment, components, and consumable 5    supplies used in the modification, replacement, repair, 6    and maintenance of aircraft engines or power plants, 7    whether such engines or power plants are installed or 8    uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable supplies" 9    include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 10    sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 11    latex gloves, and protective films. 12        Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 13    December 31, 2023, this exemption applies only to the sale 14    of qualifying tangible personal property to persons who 15    modify, refurbish, complete, replace, or maintain an 16    aircraft and who (i) hold an Air Agency Certificate and 17    are empowered to operate an approved repair station by the 18    Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) have a Class IV 19    Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in accordance with 20    Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The 21    exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 22    commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 23    service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or 24    Part 129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. From January 25    1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, this exemption applies 26    only to the sale of qualifying tangible personal property   HB1050- 92 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    to: (A) persons who modify, refurbish, complete, repair, 2    replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) hold an Air 3    Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 4    approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 5    Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) 6    conduct operations in accordance with Part 145 of the 7    Federal Aviation Regulations; and (B) persons who engage 8    in the modification, replacement, repair, and maintenance 9    of aircraft engines or power plants without regard to 10    whether or not those persons meet the qualifications of 11    item (A).12        The changes made to this paragraph (40) by Public Act 13    98-534 are declarative of existing law. It is the intent 14    of the General Assembly that the exemption under this 15    paragraph (40) applies continuously from January 1, 2010 16    through December 31, 2024; however, no claim for credit or 17    refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of the 18    disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015 19    and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of 20    Public Act 101-629).21        (41) Tangible personal property sold to a 22    public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 23    11-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 24    constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, 25    but only if the legal title to the municipal convention 26    hall is transferred to the municipality without any   HB1050- 93 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    further consideration by or on behalf of the municipality 2    at the time of the completion of the municipal convention 3    hall or upon the retirement or redemption of any bonds or 4    other debt instruments issued by the public-facilities 5    corporation in connection with the development of the 6    municipal convention hall. This exemption includes 7    existing public-facilities corporations as provided in 8    Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois Municipal Code. This 9    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 10        (42) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 11    31, 2026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 12        (43) Merchandise that is subject to the Rental 13    Purchase Agreement Occupation and Use Tax. The purchaser 14    must certify that the item is purchased to be rented 15    subject to a rental-purchase agreement, as defined in the 16    Rental-Purchase Agreement Act, and provide proof of 17    registration under the Rental Purchase Agreement 18    Occupation and Use Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt from 19    the provisions of Section 2-70.20        (44) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 21    construction or operation of a data center that has been 22    granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 23    Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 24    personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 25    tenant of the data center or by a contractor or 26    subcontractor of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data   HB1050- 94 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    centers that would have qualified for a certificate of 2    exemption prior to January 1, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 3    been in effect, may apply for and obtain an exemption for 4    subsequent purchases of computer equipment or enabling 5    software purchased or leased to upgrade, supplement, or 6    replace computer equipment or enabling software purchased 7    or leased in the original investment that would have 8    qualified. 9        The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 10    shall grant a certificate of exemption under this item 11    (44) to qualified data centers as defined by Section 12    605-1025 of the Department of Commerce and Economic 13    Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 14    Illinois. 15        For the purposes of this item (44): 16            "Data center" means a building or a series of 17        buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house 18        working servers in one physical location or multiple 19        sites within the State of Illinois. 20            "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 21        electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 22        chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 23        equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 24        generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 25        devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; 26        cabinets; telecommunications cabling infrastructure;   HB1050- 95 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1        raised floor systems; peripheral components or 2        systems; software; mechanical, electrical, or plumbing 3        systems; battery systems; cooling systems and towers; 4        temperature control systems; other cabling; and other 5        data center infrastructure equipment and systems 6        necessary to operate qualified tangible personal 7        property, including fixtures; and component parts of 8        any of the foregoing, including installation, 9        maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and replacement of 10        qualified tangible personal property to generate, 11        transform, transmit, distribute, or manage electricity 12        necessary to operate qualified tangible personal 13        property; and all other tangible personal property 14        that is essential to the operations of a computer data 15        center. The term "qualified tangible personal 16        property" also includes building materials physically 17        incorporated into the qualifying data center. To 18        document the exemption allowed under this Section, the 19        retailer must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the 20        certificate of eligibility issued by the Department of 21        Commerce and Economic Opportunity. 22        This item (44) is exempt from the provisions of 23    Section 2-70. 24        (45) Beginning January 1, 2020 and through December 25    31, 2020, sales of tangible personal property made by a 26    marketplace seller over a marketplace for which tax is due   HB1050- 96 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    under this Act but for which use tax has been collected and 2    remitted to the Department by a marketplace facilitator 3    under Section 2d of the Use Tax Act are exempt from tax 4    under this Act. A marketplace seller claiming this 5    exemption shall maintain books and records demonstrating 6    that the use tax on such sales has been collected and 7    remitted by a marketplace facilitator. Marketplace sellers 8    that have properly remitted tax under this Act on such 9    sales may file a claim for credit as provided in Section 6 10    of this Act. No claim is allowed, however, for such taxes 11    for which a credit or refund has been issued to the 12    marketplace facilitator under the Use Tax Act, or for 13    which the marketplace facilitator has filed a claim for 14    credit or refund under the Use Tax Act. 15        (46) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 16    collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. 17    This item (46) is exempt from the provisions of Section 18    2-70. As used in this item (46): 19        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 20    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 21    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 22    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 23    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 24    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 25    time of sale. 26        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means   HB1050- 97 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 2    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 3    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 4    milk until it is ready for consumption. 5        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 6    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 7    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 8    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 9    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 10    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 11    milk storage bags. 12        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 13    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 14    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 15    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 16    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 17    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 18    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 19    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 20    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 21    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 22    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 23    or distributor. 24        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 25    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 26    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the   HB1050- 98 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 2    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 3    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 4    manufacturer or distributor. 5        (47) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf 6    of the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform 7    Unclaimed Property Act. This item (47) is exempt from the 8    provisions of Section 2-70. 9        (48) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 10    property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 11    forces of the United States who presents valid military 12    identification and purchases the property using a form of 13    payment where the federal government is the payor. The 14    member of the armed forces must complete, at the point of 15    sale, a form prescribed by the Department of Revenue 16    documenting that the transaction is eligible for the 17    exemption under this paragraph. Retailers must keep the 18    form as documentation of the exemption in their records 19    for a period of not less than 6 years. "Armed forces of the 20    United States" means the United States Army, Navy, Air 21    Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard. This 22    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 23        (49) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals 24    provided to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment 25    is made by an intermediary, such as a Medicare 26    Administrative Contractor, a Managed Care Organization, or   HB1050- 99 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1    a Medicare Advantage Organization, pursuant to a 2    government contract. This paragraph (49) is exempt from 3    the provisions of Section 2-70. 4        (50) (49) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further 5    defined in Section 2-10, food for human consumption that 6    is to be consumed off the premises where it is sold (other 7    than alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused 8    with adult use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that 9    has been prepared for immediate consumption). This item 10    (50) (49) is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 11        (51) (49) Gross receipts from the lease of the 12    following tangible personal property:13            (1) computer software transferred subject to a 14        license that meets the following requirements:15                (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement 16            signed by the licensor and the customer;17                    (i) an electronic agreement in which the 18                customer accepts the license by means of an 19                electronic signature that is verifiable and 20                can be authenticated and is attached to or 21                made part of the license will comply with this 22                requirement;23                    (ii) a license agreement in which the 24                customer electronically accepts the terms by 25                clicking "I agree" does not comply with this 26                requirement;  HB1050- 100 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1                (B) it restricts the customer's duplication 2            and use of the software;3                (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 4            sublicensing, or transferring the software to a 5            third party (except to a related party) without 6            the permission and continued control of the 7            licensor;8                (D) the licensor has a policy of providing 9            another copy at minimal or no charge if the 10            customer loses or damages the software, or of 11            permitting the licensee to make and keep an 12            archival copy, and such policy is either stated in 13            the license agreement, supported by the licensor's 14            books and records, or supported by a notarized 15            statement made under penalties of perjury by the 16            licensor; and17                (E) the customer must destroy or return all 18            copies of the software to the licensor at the end 19            of the license period; this provision is deemed to 20            be met, in the case of a perpetual license, 21            without being set forth in the license agreement; 22            and23            (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 24        receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local 25        government if the ordinance imposing that tax was 26        adopted prior to January 1, 2023.   HB1050- 101 -LRB104 05849 HLH 15880 b1        (52) On and after January 1, 2026, hearing aids. As 2    used in this item (52), "hearing aid" means any wearable 3    non-disposable, non-experimental instrument or device 4    designed to aid or compensate for impaired human hearing 5    and any parts, attachments, or accessories for the 6    instrument or device, including an ear mold but excluding 7    batteries and cords. This item (52) is exempt from the 8    provisions of Section 2-70. 9(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-634, eff. 8-27-21; 10102-700, Article 70, Section 70-20, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, 11Article 75, Section 75-20, eff. 4-19-22; 102-813, eff. 125-13-22; 102-1026, eff. 5-27-22; 103-9, Article 5, Section 135-20, eff. 6-7-23; 103-9, Article 15, Section 15-20, eff. 146-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, 15eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 7-1-24; 16103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995, eff. 178-9-24; revised 11-26-24.) 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.